New York, session 2025-2026, S759.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 27-2201 of the environmental 2 conservation law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending 3 the environmental conservation law relating to expanding the food 4 donation and food scraps recycling program, as proposed in legislative 5 bills numbers S. 5331-A and A. 5906-A, is amended to read as follows: 6 1. "Designated food scraps generator" means a person who generates at 7 a single location an annual average of two tons per week or more of food 8 scraps between January first, two thousand twenty-three and December 9 thirty-first, two thousand [twenty-five] twenty-six, an annual average 10 of one ton per week or more of food scraps between January first, two 11 thousand [twenty-six] twenty-seven and December thirty-first, two thou- 12 sand [twenty-seven] twenty-eight, and an annual average of one-half ton 13 per week or more of food scraps beginning January first, two thousand 14 [twenty-eight] twenty-nine and thereafter based on a methodology estab- 15 lished by the department pursuant to regulations, including, supermar- 16 kets, large food service businesses, higher educational institutions, 17 hotels, food processors, correctional facilities, and sports or enter- 18 tainment venues. For a location with multiple independent food service 19 businesses, such as a mall or college campus, the entity responsible for EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02835-01-5 S. 759 2 1 contracting for solid waste hauling services is responsible for managing 2 food scraps from the independent businesses. 3 § 2. Section 4 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the environ- 4 mental conservation law relating to expanding the food donation and food 5 scraps recycling program, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 6 5331-A and A. 5906-A, is amended to read as follows: 7 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 8 section two of this act shall take effect January 1, [2026] 2027. 9 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however section 10 one of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 11 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the environmental 12 conservation law relating to expanding the food donation and food scraps 13 recycling program, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5331-A 14 and A. 5906-A, takes effect.